North Dakota, session 69, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-06.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Senior community service employment program - Compensation rate.
The hourly rate of compensation for individuals paid by the department under the senior community
service employment program is twelve dollars or the amount established by the department by
administrative rule, within the limits of legislative appropriation.

H. B. NO. 1066 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1066.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 1 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 3 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State